Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 794. INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR BORDER SECURITY

Sec. 794.001. AUTHORITY TO DEVELOP AND EXECUTE COMPACT. On behalf of this state, the governor may develop and execute an interstate compact for border security among interested states.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 285 (S.B. 1403), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 794.002. CONGRESSIONAL APPROVAL NOT REQUIRED. (a) It is the intent of the legislature that the compact developed and executed under this chapter not require congressional approval.

(b) The compact may not increase the political power of the compacting states in relation to the federal government.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 285 (S.B. 1403), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 794.003. INTERSTATE COMPACT PROVISIONS. The compact authorized by this chapter must provide for joint action among compacting states on matters that include:

(1) sharing law enforcement intelligence on illegal activity occurring at the border with Mexico;

(2) sharing state resources in order to build a physical barrier, a comprehensive technological surveillance system, or both, on state land to deter or detect illegal activity occurring at the border with Mexico; and

(3) sharing other law enforcement resources to ensure the protection of personnel and property.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 285 (S.B. 1403), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.